North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 8. Brucellosis (Bang’s Disease).

§ 106-388.
Animals affected with, or exposed to, brucellosis declared subject to quarantine, etc.

It is hereby declared that the disease of animals known as brucellosis, or Bang’s disease, is of an infectious and contagious nature, and animals affected with, or exposed to, or suspected of being carriers of the disease, shall be subject to quarantine and the rules and regulations of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 1; 1967, c. 511; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-389.
Brucellosis defined; program for vaccination; sale, etc., of vaccine; cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture.

“Brucellosis” shall mean the disease wherein an animal is infected with Brucella organisms (including Brucella Abortus, B. Melitensis and B. Suis), irrespective of the occurrence or absence of abortion or other symptoms. An animal shall be declared affected with brucellosis if it is classified as a reactor to a serological test for the disease, or if the Brucella organism has been found in the body, its secretions or discharges. The State Veterinarian is hereby authorized and empowered to set up a program for the vaccination of calves in accordance with the recommendations of the Brucellosis Committee of the United States Livestock Sanitary Association, and approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, when in his opinion vaccination is necessary for the control and eradication of brucellosis. Vaccinated animals shall be permanently identified by tattooing or other methods approved by the Commissioner of Agriculture. Above the ages designated by regulation of the Board of Agriculture, all such vaccinates classified as reactors on an official test for brucellosis, shall be considered as affected with brucellosis and shall be branded with the letter “B” in accordance with

G.S. 106-390

. It shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, distribute, or use brucellosis vaccine or any product containing live Brucella organisms, except as provided for in regulations adopted by the Board of Agriculture.

The control and eradication of brucellosis in the herds of North Carolina shall be conducted as far as available funds will permit, and in accordance with the rules and regulations made by the Board of Agriculture. The Board of Agriculture is hereby authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in the control and eradication of brucellosis.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 2; 1945, c. 462, s. 1; 1953, c. 1119; 1967, c. 511.

§ 106-390.
Blood sample testing; diseased animals to be branded and quarantined; sale; removal of identification, etc.

All blood samples for the brucellosis test shall be drawn by persons whose qualifications are set by regulation of the Board of Agriculture. Animals from which blood is collected for a brucellosis test shall be identified by numbered ear tag, tattoo, or in some other manner approved by the Commissioner of Agriculture. It shall be the duty of the person who collects the blood sample, or other designated authorized person, to brand all cattle affected with brucellosis with the letter “B” on the left hip or jaw, not less than three or more than four inches high, tag such animals with an approved brucellosis reactor ear tag, and report the same to the State Veterinarian. It shall be the duty of the person owning said cattle at the time of said testing to assist with and cooperate with the person testing said cattle. Cattle affected with brucellosis shall be quarantined and slaughtered at a State or federally inspected slaughter plant within 10 days after branding and tagging; provided the State Veterinarian, in his discretion, may grant an extension of time for said slaughter not to exceed 30 days; and provided further that the Commissioner of Agriculture may allow a branded and tagged animal having unusual breeding value to be held for a period of time determined by him under conditions of isolation and quarantine prescribed by the State Veterinarian. Animals believed by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative to have been exposed to brucellosis, or animals classified as suspects, shall be quarantined on the owner’s premises or at such other place as is mutually agreeable to the owner and the State Veterinarian until the quarantine is removed in accordance with law or until the animal is disposed of in accordance with law. No animal affected with, or exposed to, brucellosis shall be sold, traded or otherwise disposed of except for immediate slaughter, and it shall be the duty of the person disposing of such infected animals to see that they are promptly slaughtered and a written report of same made to the State Veterinarian.

All cattle, swine, sheep, goats or other animals subject to infection by Brucella organisms, sold, or offered at public sale, except for immediate slaughter, shall be subject to test requirements established by the Board of Agriculture.

No ear tag, back tag, or other mark of identification approved by the Commissioner of Agriculture for identifying animals for the purpose of brucellosis testing, including testing at slaughter plants, shall be removed from the animal without authorization from the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 3; 1945, c. 462, s. 2; 1959, c. 1171; 1963, c. 489; 1967, c. 511; 1969, c. 465.

§ 106-391.
Civil liability of vendors.

Any person or persons who knowingly sells, or otherwise disposes of, to another, an animal affected with brucellosis shall be liable in a civil action to any person injured, and for any and all damages resulting therefrom.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 4; 1967, c. 511.

Cross References.

For similar section regarding animals affected with tuberculosis, see

G.S. 106-339

.

§ 106-392.
Sales by nonresidents.

When cattle are sold, or otherwise disposed of, in this State, by a nonresident of this State, the person or persons on whose premises the cattle are sold, or otherwise disposed of, with his knowledge and consent, shall be equally responsible for violations of

G.S. 106-388

to 106-398 and the regulations of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 5; 1967, c. 511; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-393.
Duties of State Veterinarian; quarantine of animals; required testing.

When the State Veterinarian receives information, or has reasonable grounds to believe, that brucellosis exists in any animal, or animals, or that it has been exposed to the disease, he shall promptly cause said animal, or animals, to be quarantined on the premises of owner or such other place as is mutually agreeable to the owner and the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative. Said animals shall not be removed from premises where quarantined until quarantine has been released by State Veterinarian or his authorized representative. A permit to move such infected or exposed animals to immediate slaughter may be issued by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative. The Board of Agriculture is empowered to make regulations to provide for compulsory testing of animals for brucellosis.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 6; 1967, c. 511.

§ 106-394.
Cooperation of county boards of commissioners.

The several boards of county commissioners in the State are hereby expressly authorized and empowered within their discretion to make such appropriations from the general funds of their county as will enable them to cooperate effectively with the State and United States Departments of Agriculture in the eradication of brucellosis in their respective counties.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 7; 1967, c. 511.

§ 106-395.
Compulsory testing.

Whenever a county board of commissioners shall cooperate with the State and the United States governments, as provided for in

G.S. 106-388

to 106-398, the testing of all cattle in said county shall become compulsory, and it shall be the duty of the cattle owners to give such assistance as may be necessary for the proper testing of said cattle.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 8; 1967, c. 511.

§ 106-396.
Authority to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent of the State Board of Agriculture, shall have full power to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of

G.S. 106-388

to 106-398, and for the effective control and eradication of brucellosis, including the establishment of fees and charges for the collection of blood samples.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 10; 1967, c. 511; 1981, c. 495, s. 8.

§ 106-397.
Violation made misdemeanor.

Any person or persons who shall violate any provision set forth in

G.S. 106-388

to 106-398, or any rule or regulation duly established pursuant to this Article by the State Board of Agriculture or any inspector who shall willfully fail to comply with any provisions of

G.S. 106-388

to 106-398, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 11; 1967, c. 511; 1993, c. 539, s. 773; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-398.
Punishment for sale of animals known to be infected, or under quarantine.

Any person or persons who shall willfully and knowingly sell or otherwise dispose of any animal or animals known to be affected with brucellosis, or under quarantine because of suspected exposure to brucellosis, except as provided for in

G.S. 106-388

to 106-398, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1937, c. 175, s. 12; 1967, c. 511; 1993, c. 539, s. 774; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-399.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 511.

§§ 106-399.1 through 106-399.3.

Reserved for future codification purposes.